Louisiana, session 2026, SB323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:18(A), 1860, 1969, and 1970(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§18. Suspension or revocation of insurers' licenses; fines; orders
A.(1) The Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the
commissioner of insurance may, as a penalty, in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3,
refuse to renew, or may suspend or revoke, the certificate of authority or license of
any insurer, person, or entity violating any of the provisions of this Code, or in lieu
of suspension or revocation of a certificate or license duly issued, the commissioner
may levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation per insurer,
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-347 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 323
person, or entity, up to one hundred thousand dollars aggregate for all violations in
a calendar year per insurer, person, or entity, when such violations warrant the
refusal, suspension, or revocation of such certificate or license, or the imposition of
the fine. The commissioner is also authorized to order any insurer, person, or entity
to cease and desist any such action that violates any provision of this Code. An
aggrieved party affected by the commissioner's decision, act, or order may demand
a hearing in accordance with Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S. 22:2191 et seq. If the
insurer has demanded a timely hearing, the penalty or fine ordered by the
commissioner shall not be imposed until such time as the division of administrative
law makes a finding that the penalty or fine is warranted in a proper hearing, held in
the manner provided in Chapter 12 of this Title.
(2) In the case of a violation pertaining to pharmacy benefits including
but not limited to payment for prescription drugs or pharmacist services, as
defined in R.S. 22:1852, covered under insurance or other contracts that
provide for pharmacy benefits, the commissioner shall levy a fine of twenty-five
thousand dollars for each violation per insurer, person, or entity, with no
aggregate dollar maximum. If a violation for which the commissioner has levied
a fine in accordance with this Paragraph is not corrected within thirty days
after notice of the fine is received by the insurer, person, or entity, the
commissioner shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authority or license of
the insurer, person, or entity in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3.
* * *
§1860. Violations; cease and desist orders; penalties
A. Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that any health
insurance issuer is not in full compliance with the requirements of this Subpart, the
commissioner shall notify such issuer in accordance and compliance with R.S.
49:977.3 and, after notice, the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served an
order requiring the health insurance issuer to cease and desist from any violation and
order any one or more of the following:
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-347 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 323
(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for
each and every act or violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred
thousand dollars. However, if the health insurance issuer knew or reasonably should
have known that it was in violation of this Subpart, the penalty shall be not more
than twenty-five thousand dollars for each and every act or violation, but not to
exceed an aggregate penalty of two hundred fifty thousand dollars in any six-month
period with no aggregate penalty maximum.
(2) Suspension or revocation of the certificate of authority of the health
insurance issuer to operate in this state if it knew or reasonably should have known
it was in violation of this Subpart. However, notice of any such violation by the
Office of Group Benefits shall be submitted to the governor and the chairmen of the
House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance.
B. Any health insurance issuer who violates a cease and desist order issued
by the commissioner pursuant to this Section and in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3
while such order is in effect shall, after notice, be subject at the discretion of the
commissioner to any one or more of the following:
(1) A monetary penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for
each and every act or violation, not to exceed an aggregate of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars with no aggregate penalty maximum.
(2) Suspension or revocation of the certificate of authority of the health
insurance issuer to operate in this state. However, notice of any such violation by the
Office of Group Benefits shall be submitted to the governor and the chairmen of the
House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance.
C. If a violation for which the commissioner has issued a cease and desist
order pursuant to this Section is not corrected within thirty days after notice of
the cease and desist order is received by the health insurance issuer, the
commissioner shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of the health
insurance issuer in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3.
C.D. An aggrieved party affected by the commissioner's decision, act, or
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-347 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 323
order may demand a hearing in accordance with Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S.
22:2191 et seq.
* * *
§1969. Violations; penalties
A. If, after receiving the person's answer or response or if no answer or
response is received within twenty days of receipt of mailing, faxing, or electronic
or physical delivery of the notice, the commissioner shall determine that the person
charged has engaged in an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act
or practice, the commissioner shall reduce his findings to writing and shall issue and
cause to be served upon the person charged with the violation a copy of such
findings and an order requiring such person to cease and desist from engaging in
such method of competition, act, or practice and, except as provided in Subsection
B of this Section, order any one or more of the following:
(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for
each and every act or violation, but not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one
hundred thousand dollars unless the person knew or reasonably should have known
he was in violation of this Part, in which case the penalty shall be not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars for each and every act or violation, but not to exceed
an aggregate penalty of five hundred thousand dollars in any six-month period.
(2) Suspension or revocation of the license of the person if he knew or
reasonably should have known he was in violation of this Part.
B. In the case of a violation pertaining to pharmacy benefits including
but not limited to payment for prescription drugs or pharmacist services, as
defined in R.S. 22:1852, covered under insurance or other contracts that
provide for pharmacy benefits, the commissioner shall levy a fine of twenty-five
thousand dollars for each violation with no aggregate dollar maximum. If a
violation for which the commissioner has levied a fine in accordance with this
Subsection is not corrected within thirty days after notice of the cease and desist
order is received by the person, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-347 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 323
person's certificate of authority or license in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3.
B.C. An aggrieved party affected by the commissioner's decision, act, or
order may demand a hearing in accordance with Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S.
22:2191 et seq.
§1970. Cease and desist order; penalty for violation
A. Any person who violates a cease and desist order of the commissioner
under R.S. 22:1969 and while such order is in effect may, after compliance with R.S.
49:977.3, be subject at the discretion of the commissioner to any one or more of the
following:
(1) A Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, a monetary
penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for each and every act or
violation, not to exceed an aggregate of two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) Suspension or revocation of such person's license or certificate of
authority.
(3) In the case of a violation pertaining to pharmacy benefits including
but not limited to payment for prescription drugs or pharmacist services, as
defined in R.S. 22:1852, covered under insurance or other contracts that
provide for pharmacy benefits, the commissioner shall levy a fine of twenty-five
thousand dollars for each violation with no aggregate dollar maximum. If a
violation for which the commissioner has levied a fine in accordance with this
Paragraph is not corrected within thirty days after notice of the violation is
received by the person, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the person's
certificate of authority or license in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-347 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 323